Missouri, session 2026, SB1440.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.435, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 166.435,
to read as follows:
166.435. 1. (1) Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, the assets of the program held by the board, the
assets of any deposit program authorized in section 166.500,
and the assets of any qualified tuition program established
pursuant to Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code and any
income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation by the
state or any of its political subdivisions. Income earned
or received from the program, deposit, or other qualified
tuition programs established under Section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or refunds of qualified education
expenses received by a beneficiary from an eligible
educational institution in connection with withdrawal from
enrollment at such institution which are contributed within
sixty days of withdrawal to a qualified tuition program of
which such individual is a beneficiary shall not be subject
to state income tax imposed pursuant to chapter 143 and
shall be eligible for any benefits provided in accordance

SB 1440 2
with Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The
exemption from taxation pursuant to this section shall apply
only to assets and income maintained, accrued, or expended
pursuant to the requirements of the program established
pursuant to sections 166.400 to 166.455, the deposit program
established pursuant to sections 166.500 to 166.529, and
other qualified tuition programs established under Section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code, and no exemption shall
apply to assets and income expended for any other purposes.
(2) For all tax years ending on or before December 31,
2025, annual contributions made to the program held by the
board, the deposit program, and any qualified tuition
program established under Section 529 of the Internal
Revenue Code up to and including eight thousand dollars per
taxpayer, and up to sixteen thousand dollars for married
individuals filing a joint tax return, shall be subtracted
in determining Missouri adjusted gross income pursuant to
section 143.121.
(3) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, annual contributions made to the deposit program or
the Missouri education program established under sections
166.400 to 166.455, or both, up to and including eight
thousand dollars per taxpayer, and up to sixteen thousand
dollars for married individuals filing a joint tax return,
shall be subtracted in determining Missouri adjusted gross
income pursuant to section 143.121.
2. If any deductible contributions to or earnings from
any such program referred to in this section are distributed
and not used to pay qualified education expenses, not
transferred as allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i),
as amended, and any Internal Revenue Service regulations or
guidance issued in relation thereto, or are not held for the

SB 1440 3
minimum length of time established by the appropriate
Missouri board, then the amount so distributed shall be
included in the Missouri adjusted gross income of the
participant, or, if the participant is not living, the
beneficiary.
3. The provisions of this section shall apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and the
provisions of this section with regard to sections 166.500
to 166.529 shall apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2004.
✓